District of Columbia statutes.
19-603.05

Form of registration in beneficiary form.

Registration in beneficiary form may be shown by the words “transfer on death” or the abbreviation “TOD,” or by the words “pay on death” or the abbreviation “POD,” after the name of the registered owner and before the name of a beneficiary.

History

Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-292, § 302(b), 48 DCR 2087

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 305 of the Uniform Nonprobate Transfers on Death Act (1991 Act).